Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Forest Conservation

149.330.
Definitions for KRS 149.330 to 149.355.

As used in KRS 149.330 to 149.355, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Best management practices” means effective, practical, economical, structural, or nonstructural methods that prevent or reduce the movement of sediment, nutrients, pesticides, and other pollutants from the land to surface or groundwater, or that otherwise protect water quality from potential adverse effects of timber harvesting operations as developed by the Division of Forestry and approved by the Agriculture Water Quality Authority;

“Cabinet” means the Energy and Environment Cabinet;

“Director” means the director of the Division of Forestry;

“Division” means the Division of Forestry;

“Logger” means any person who conducts timber harvesting operations for commercial purposes;

“Operator” means any person who operates or exercises control over any timber harvesting operations;

“Person” means any natural person or any director, officer, or agent of a partnership, corporation, association, society, joint stock company, firm, company, or business organization. “Person” also means any agency or instrumentality of federal, state, or local government, including any publicly-owned utility or any publicly-owned corporation of federal, state, or local government;

“Timber harvesting operations” means activities directly related to the cutting or removal of trees from the forest as a raw material for commercial processes or purposes, including timber preharvesting and postharvesting activities associated with the implementation of appropriate best management practices. “Timber harvesting operations” does not include:

The cutting of firewood;

The cutting of evergreens grown for and cut for the traditional Christmas holiday season;

The removal of trees incidental to clearing for coal mining or farm purposes or incidental to ground-disturbing construction activities, including well sites, and access roads and gathering lines for oil and natural gas operations;

The cutting of trees for maintaining existing, or during construction of, rights-of-way for public highways or public utilities, unless those trees are being sold or provided as raw material for commercial wood product purposes; or

The cutting of trees by an individual, nonindustrial landowner on his own property, if the cutting is performed by the individual, nonindustrial landowner; and

“Water pollution” has the same meaning as in KRS 224.1-010.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 555, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 158, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 41, § 1, effective June 24, 2015.

149.332.
Legislative findings and declarations — Purpose — Construction with other laws.

The General Assembly finds, determines, and declares as follows:

Healthy, sustainable forests that are ecologically sound provide economic opportunities and benefit the overall quality of life for all Kentuckians;

High quality forests provide clean air and water and biodiversity;

A diverse forest economy must include forest product industries, recreation, and tourism;

Timber harvesting operations must be conducted in an ecologically sound manner;

Kentucky must promote the stewardship of its public and private forest lands while recognizing the rights and responsibilities of private landowners;

Comprehensive continuous forest inventories are needed to provide information to make decisions to meet present and future needs;

Increased awareness of the economic, social, and ecological importance of Kentucky’s forests is needed to:

Educate the public and industry in order to make wise decisions for the future of the forest resource; and

Recognize and respond to threats to the forest resource;

It is the purpose of KRS 149.330 to 149.355 to provide private landowners and loggers with education, technical assistance, and incentives that encourage them to manage their properties and carry out timber harvesting operations that will assure sustainable forests in the Commonwealth; and

KRS 149.330 to 149.355 shall not be construed as affecting the requirements of any other laws of the Commonwealth relating to environmental protection, including water quality or forestry.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 555, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

149.334.
Powers and duties of cabinet as to forest conservation — Authority for administrative regulations.

In addition to any other powers and duties vested in it by law, the cabinet has the authority, power, and duty to:

Promote the sustainability of Kentucky’s forest ecosystems;

Improve, maintain, and protect the health and condition of Kentucky’s forest resources;

Promote the most efficient utilization of forest resources;

Provide educational opportunities to increase landowner, logger, and public appreciation, awareness, and knowledge of Kentucky’s forests; and

Promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A to accomplish the purposes of KRS 149.330 to 149.355.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 555, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.

149.336.
Information and education program.

There is established within the division an information and education program for the following purposes:

To develop public awareness of the importance of the forests of Kentucky;

To promote forest stewardship and sound forest utilization practices of private woodland owners and the forest industry; and

To coordinate with other agencies and organizations to assure effective, long-term forest conservation programs.

The division shall implement an educational program that emphasizes sustainable forests and the full range of economic, ecological, and social opportunities provided by privately owned forests by:

Sponsoring field days that enable individual woodland owners to recognize and resolve problems that they encounter in dealing with their woodland resources;

Developing demonstration programs involving forests and management of forest ecosystems including urban forests;

Developing and implementing programs that give special attention to educational needs of small, private, nonindustrial forest landowners; and

Supporting the Kentucky Cooperative Extension Service in promoting and conducting technology transfer education programs specifically for woodland owners.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 555, § 4, effective July 15, 1998.

149.338.
Inventory of Kentucky forests to be maintained — Assistance with implementation of surveys.

The division shall maintain an inventory of Kentucky’s forests and provide a report on the status of Kentucky’s forests on a biennial basis. The status report shall address, at a minimum, timber growth and removal, commercial species composition, timber quality, market information, forest health, and industry activity. The division shall cooperate with the United States Forest Service in carrying out the provisions of this subsection.

In order to have accurate, current, and complete information and data, the division shall:

Assist the implementation of the Southern Annual Forest Inventory System by supplying five (5) two-person crews to perform annual data collection;

Develop and implement annual surveys of mills, landowners, timber buyers, and other appropriate entities to determine levels of harvesting and timber and log prices; and

Use Geographic Information System (GIS) technology and ensure coordination with statewide GIS efforts.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 555, § 5, effective July 15, 1998.

149.340.
Forest stewardship incentives fund — Use.

There is established a forest stewardship incentives fund to be administered by the division. Moneys from the fund shall be used for cost-share programs to provide financial assistance to landowners for the development of stewardship plans, and for stewardship practices, including, but not limited to, reforestation and afforestation, forest improvement, soil and water protection and improvement, riparian and wetland protection and improvement, wildlife habitat improvement and permanent wildlife planting, and forest recreation enhancement.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 555, § 6, effective July 15, 1998.

149.342.
Timber harvesting operations — Master logger training and educational requirements — Temporary master logger designation.

After two (2) years from July 15, 1998, no person shall conduct timber harvesting operations within the Commonwealth unless there is on the site during the timber harvesting operations at least one (1) logger in charge of the harvest who has successfully completed the Master Logger Program or who has received a temporary master logger designation in accordance with the cabinet requirements as provided for in subsection (4) of this section.

After successful completion of the Master Logger Program, continuing education shall be required of the loggers every three (3) years.

The cabinet shall specify the education and training requirements for the Master Logger Program as developed by the University of Kentucky, the Kentucky Forest Industries Association, and the division, shall specify the requirements for continuing education, and, may establish a basic fee for the program that bears a reasonable relationship to the cost of training.

The cabinet shall specify requirements for a temporary master logger designation, which shall be valid for four (4) months.

A logger or operator who uses a temporary master logger shall notify the division prior to beginning the timber harvesting operation on which a temporary master logger is on site and in charge.

The division shall maintain a current list of all loggers who have successfully completed the Master Logger Program and required continuing education, and shall make the list available to the public. All master loggers shall provide the cabinet with a published phone number.

Loggers who have previously completed the Kentucky Master Logger Program are considered to be in compliance with subsection (1) of this section.

Any logger who primarily uses mules or horses in the logging operation shall be exempt from the Master Logger Program.

After two (2) years from July 15, 1998, all state parks shall have on staff at least one (1) employee who has completed the Master Logger Program.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 555, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 39, § 1, effective June 20, 2005.

149.344.
Use of appropriate best management practices — Violation — Noncompliance — Administrative regulations governing bad actor designation — Procedure after multiple violations — Opportunity for administrative hearing.

Any logger or operator engaged in the conduct of any timber harvesting operations shall use appropriate best management practices.

No logger or operator shall conduct any timber harvesting operations in a manner that is causing or will likely cause water pollution.

If the cabinet determines that a logger or operator engaged in timber harvesting operations has failed to use the appropriate best management practices or is causing water pollution, the cabinet shall give the logger or operator a written warning of the facts alleged to constitute the failure to use the best management practice or the water pollution, and a reasonable period for abatement and compliance.

If, after the time for abatement in the written warning, the cabinet determines that the logger or operator has failed to implement the appropriate best management practices or has failed to abate the water pollution, the logger or operator will be provided an opportunity for an informal conference with the regional forester. After the opportunity for an informal conference, if the cabinet determines that the logger or operator has failed to implement the appropriate best management practices or has failed to abate the water pollution, the cabinet shall issue a notice of violation stating the best management practice that the logger or operator has failed to implement or the facts alleged to constitute the water pollution, and order the logger or operator to implement corrective measures within a specified period of time.

If, after the issuance of a notice of violation, the logger or operator fails to implement the best management practice or corrective measures, the cabinet shall issue a special order mandating the logger or operator to immediately implement the best management practice or the corrective measures. The cabinet may also order the logger or operator to cease all or a portion of the timber harvesting operation constituting the violation, and if the cabinet does so, the logger or operator shall cease all or a portion of the timber harvesting operation, until an inspection determines that the violation has been abated. At the time the special order is issued, the cabinet shall notify the logger or operator of the opportunity for an administrative hearing under KRS 149.346(2), to be held within five (5) working days of the receipt of a written request made by the logger or operator.

If the cabinet finds that any logger or operator is conducting any timber harvesting operations in violation of KRS 149.342(1) or in a manner that is causing or is likely to cause water pollution that is presenting or will likely present an imminent and substantial danger to the public health, safety, or welfare, or to the health of animals, fish, or aquatic life, or to a public water supply, or to recreational, commercial, agricultural, or industrial uses, the cabinet may issue an emergency order directing the logger or operator to immediately cease the activity and implement corrective measures within a reasonable time, and the logger or operator shall immediately cease the activity and implement corrective measures. At the time the order is issued, the cabinet shall also notify the logger or operator of the opportunity for an administrative hearing under KRS 149.346(2) to be held within five (5) working days of the receipt of a written request. The commencement of proceedings by the cabinet under subsection (3), (4), (5), or (10) of this section shall not preclude the cabinet from issuing an emergency order under this subsection.

Notification under this section shall be by certified mail, return receipt requested, sent to the last known address of the logger or operator, or by hand delivery by the cabinet.

If the logger or operator fails or refuses to cease activity or comply with and implement the best management practices or corrective measures in a special order issued under subsection (5) of this section or fails to cease activity and implement corrective measures in an emergency order under subsection (6) of this section, unless extended by the cabinet, the logger or operator shall be deemed a bad actor and shall be subject to civil penalties under KRS 149.348 after an opportunity for a hearing under KRS 149.346. The cabinet shall have the authority to remove or terminate bad actor designations from loggers or operators that demonstrate adherence to implementing best management practices, have paid all fines and penalties imposed by the cabinet, and have completed corrective action on sites with violations.

The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations to establish rules and procedures to remove or terminate the bad actor designation from a logger or operator that was previously designated a bad actor under subsection (8) of this section.

If the cabinet determines that a logger or operator engaged in timber harvesting operations has failed to use the appropriate best management practices in violation of this section, and the logger or operator has been issued two (2) or more bad actor designations under KRS 149.346, the cabinet shall immediately issue a warning and, if the violations are not corrected after a period defined by the warning but no longer than one (1) week, shall issue an order directing the logger or operator to immediately cease the activity and implement corrective measures within a reasonable time, and the logger or operator shall immediately cease the activity and implement corrective measures. At the time the order is issued, the cabinet shall also notify the logger or operator of the opportunity for an administrative hearing under KRS 149.346(2) to be held within five (5) working days of the receipt of a written request.

Any logger or operator who has been designated a bad actor under subsection (8) of this section shall provide prior notice to the appropriate regional office or offices of the division before engaging in any timber harvesting operation regulated by the cabinet until he or she has paid all civil penalties and performed all of the site remediation required by the cabinet.
(11) (a)

Any logger or operator who has been designated a bad actor under subsection (8) of this section shall provide prior notice to the appropriate regional office or offices of the division before engaging in any timber harvesting operation regulated by the cabinet until he or she has paid all civil penalties and performed all of the site remediation required by the cabinet.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to set forth the form and manner of the notification required by this subsection. The notification requirements of this subsection shall take effect on the effective date of the administrative regulations required by this paragraph.

Beginning on January 1, 2016, if the cabinet finds that any logger or operator has three (3) or more bad actor designations under subsection (8) of this section, the cabinet shall issue an emergency order directing the logger or operator to immediately cease all timber harvesting operations in the Commonwealth. Upon receiving the emergency order, the logger or operator shall cease all timber harvesting operations in the Commonwealth until he or she has performed all of the site remediation required by the cabinet and has either paid all civil penalties or remains up to date on a payment plan for civil penalties with the cabinet. At the time the order is issued, the cabinet shall also notify the logger or operator of the opportunity for an administrative hearing under KRS 149.346(2) to be held within five (5) working days of the receipt of a written request. The commencement of proceedings by the cabinet under subsection (3), (4), (5), or (10) of this section shall not preclude the cabinet from issuing an emergency order under this subsection. A logger or operator who otherwise complies with the requirements of this subsection shall not be required to remove any of his or her bad actor designations as a condition of being allowed to restart timber harvesting operations in the Commonwealth.

All bad actor designations issued under subsection (8) of this section, including those issued prior to June 24, 2015, shall be included in determining the applicability of this section to any logger or operator.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 555, § 8, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 39, § 2, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 43, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2015 ch. 41, § 2, effective June 24, 2015.

149.346.
Administrative hearings.

If the cabinet has evidence that a violation of KRS 149.342(1) or 149.344(11) has occurred, or has deemed a logger or operator to be a bad actor under KRS 149.344(8), the cabinet shall serve written notice of the determination and the provision alleged to have been violated, and the cabinet shall require the person complained against to answer the charges at an administrative hearing to be held not less than twenty-one (21) days after the date of the notice, unless the person complained against waives the twenty-one (21) day period.

Any person not previously heard who considers himself aggrieved by any determination of the cabinet under KRS 149.330 to 149.355 may file a petition alleging that the determination is contrary to law or fact and is injurious to him, citing the grounds and reasons therefor, and demanding an administrative hearing. Unless the cabinet considers the petition frivolous, it shall schedule an administrative hearing before the cabinet not less than ninety (90) days after the date of the notice, unless the person complained against waives the ninety (90) day period, except that hearings requested under KRS 149.344(5) and (6) shall be held within five (5) working days of receipt of a petition. The right to demand a hearing under this subsection shall be limited to a period of thirty (30) days after the petitioner has had actual notice of the determination complained of, or could have had notice. The cabinet shall be represented at the administrative hearing by the Office of Legal Services.

All hearings under KRS 149.330 to 149.355 shall be conducted under KRS 224.10-440. Appeals may be taken from all final orders under KRS 224.10-470.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 555, § 9, effective July 15, 1998; 2015 ch. 41, § 3, effective June 24, 2015; 2018 ch. 29, § 48, effective July 14, 2018.

149.348.
Assessment of civil penalties — Personal liability.

Any operator or logger who is deemed by the cabinet to be a bad actor under KRS 149.344(8) or who violates KRS 149.342(1) or 149.344(11) may, after an opportunity for an administrative hearing, be assessed a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation. In determining the amount of the penalty, consideration shall be given to the operator’s or logger’s history of noncompliance; the seriousness of the violation and any damage caused, including any irreparable harm to the environment or hazard to public health or safety or the health and safety of animals, fish, or aquatic life; the degree of fault and whether the conduct was intentional or negligent; and the demonstrated good faith in remedying the pollution. The penalties shall be recoverable in an action brought in the name of the Commonwealth of Kentucky by the cabinet’s Office of Legal Services. All sums recovered shall be deposited in the Forest Stewardship Incentives Fund. The Circuit Court in the county in which the violation occurred shall have concurrent jurisdiction and venue of all civil and injunctive actions instituted by the cabinet for the enforcement of the provisions of KRS 149.330 to 149.355 or the orders and administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet.

Notwithstanding KRS Chapters 271B to 275 or any other provision of law to the contrary, any director, officer, or agent of an operator or logger doing business as a partnership, corporation, association, society, joint stock company, firm, company, or business organization shall be personally liable, jointly and severally, for the civil penalties incurred by the operator or logger under this section.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 555, § 10, effective July 15, 1998; 2015 ch. 41, § 4, effective June 24, 2015; 2018 ch. 29, § 49, effective July 14, 2018.

149.350.
Forestry Best Management Practices Board.

There is hereby established a Forestry Best Management Practices Board consisting of thirteen (13) members for the purposes of updating Kentucky’s forest practice guidelines for water quality management and the Division of Forestry’s administrative regulations regarding timber harvesting operations, and supervising the implementation of forestry best management practices and timber harvesting operations regulations by the Division of Forestry. The offices of the board shall be maintained at a place designated by the board.

The initial appointments to the board shall be made within one (1) year of July 15, 1998, and the appointments shall be for staggered terms to assure continuity. The Governor shall appoint members to the board representing the following:

Five (5) members who are farmers or woodland owners with at least fifty (50) acres of woodland and who are actively engaged in woodland management:

One (1) of these members from a list of three (3) persons nominated by the Kentucky Woodland Owners Association;

One (1) of these members from a list of three (3) persons nominated by the Kentucky Department of Agriculture;

One (1) of these members from a list of three (3) persons nominated by the Kentucky Farm Bureau Federation; and

Two (2) of these members shall be farmers at large;

One (1) logger in good standing;

One (1) member of the Department of Forestry of the University of Kentucky;

One (1) member of the Kentucky Division of Forestry;

Three (3) members of a Kentucky wood industry; and

Two (2) members at large who are woodland owners.

Except for initial staggered appointments, board memberships shall be for a period of four (4) years, and members may be appointed to no more than two (2) full consecutive terms. Appointments to the board shall be made consistent with subsection (2) of this section.

The chair of the board shall be chosen from the members selected to meet the criteria in subsection (2) of this section.

The board shall review existing forestry best management practices within one (1) year after establishment of the board and shall conduct periodic reviews for rewriting the best management practices regulations no sooner than every five (5) years thereafter.

The board shall oversee implementation of best management practice education and enforcement by the Division of Forestry.

The board shall meet at least once a year for the purpose of conducting its oversight responsibilities.

The board shall be attached to the division for administrative purposes. The division shall provide funds necessary for board meetings, travel expenses, and other administrative support, including but not limited to staff assistance at meetings, report preparation, and record keeping.

The board shall present its findings and recommendations to the Office of the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission when the board deems appropriate or when the Office of the Governor specifically requests a report. The board shall provide a summary report of its findings and recommendations to the Office of the Governor every five (5) years and to the Legislative Research Commission, if deemed appropriate.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 555, § 11, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 56, § 1, effective July 12, 2006.

149.355.
Short title for KRS 149.330 to 149.355.

KRS 149.330 to 149.355 may be cited as the “Kentucky Forest Conservation Act.”

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 555, § 12, effective July 15, 1998.